District of Columbia statutes.
31-4106

Purchasing groups — Exemption from certain laws.

A purchasing group and its insurer or insurers shall be subject to all applicable laws of the District, except that a purchasing group and its insurer or insurers shall be exempt, in regard to liability insurance for the purchasing group, from any law that would:

(1)

Prohibit the establishment of a purchasing group;

(2)

Make it unlawful for an insurer to provide, or offer to provide, insurance on a basis providing to a purchasing group or its members advantages based on their loss and expense experience not afforded to other persons with respect to rates, policy forms, coverages, or other matters;

(3)

Prohibit a purchasing group or its members from purchasing insurance on a group basis described in paragraph (2) of this section;

(4)

Prohibit a purchasing group from obtaining insurance on a group because the group has not been in existence for a minimum period of time or because any member has not belonged to the group for a minimum period of time;

(5)

Require that a purchasing group must have a minimum number of common ownership or affiliation, or certain legal form;

(6)

Require that a certain percentage of a purchasing group must obtain insurance on a group basis;

(7)

Otherwise discriminate against a purchasing group or any of its members; or

(8)

Require that any insurance policy issued to a purchasing group or any of its members be countersigned by an insurance agent or broker residing in the District.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-46, § 7, 40 DCR 6082

History

1981 Ed., § 35-2906.

Prior Codifications